Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202083-966
Lethal injection; participation of professional; how treated under other law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(1) Any prescription, preparation, compounding, dispensing, obtaining, or administration of the substances deemed necessary to perform a lethal injection shall not constitute the practice of medicine or any other profession relating to health care which is subject by law to regulation, licensure, or certification;

(2) A pharmacist or pharmaceutical supplier may dispense the designated substances, without a prescription, to the Director of Correctional Services or the director's designee upon production of a written request from the director for the designated substances necessary to conduct an execution;

(3) Obtaining, preparing, compounding, dispensing, and administering the substance or substances designated by the execution protocol does not violate the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or sections 71-2501 to 71-2512; and

(4) If a person who is a member of the execution team is licensed by a board or department, the licensing board or department shall not censure, reprimand, suspend, revoke, or take any other disciplinary action against that person's license as a result of that person's participation in a court-ordered execution.

Laws 2009, LB36, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 83-966 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.
Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.